Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 67.2 Education of Children with Dyslexia and Related Disorders

16-67.2-1.
Teacher professional development and training.

No later than September 1, 2021, the department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and make available on its website resources to assist school districts in developing a program to ensure all teachers and school administrators have access to materials to support professional awareness of best practices on:

Recognition of the characteristics of dyslexia, related disorders, dyscalculia, and dysgraphia; and

Evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia, related disorders, dyscalculia, and dysgraphia.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 2.

16-67.2-2.
Learning laboratory.

The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall develop a collaborative learning laboratory (the “laboratory”) to assist and promote training for parents, guardians, caregivers, and teachers in:

Recognition of the characteristics of dyslexia, related disorders, dyscalculia, and dysgraphia; and

Evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia, related disorders, dyscalculia, and dysgraphia.

In developing the laboratory, the department shall work with professionals and experts who have proven, data-driven models of success in teaching students with dyslexia. The department shall seek to foster partnerships among educators and practitioners from both the public and private teaching sectors, with the goal of ensuring that every student in this state who has dyslexia shall be appropriately and adequately screened, diagnosed, and provided therapy, instruction, and accommodations as needed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 2.

16-67.2-3.
Department of elementary and secondary education responsibilities.

The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall disseminate, using web-based technology, research-based best-practice methods by which the state and district school boards and committees shall evaluate and improve the professional development system of teachers in regard to dyslexia.

The department shall also disseminate, using web-based technology, professional development in the use of integrated digital instruction at schools that include middle grades.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 2.

16-67.2-4.
Dyslexia and related disorder education in teacher preparation programs.

No later than the 2021-2022 school year, the department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall collaborate with the board of education to require that all department-approved undergraduate educator preparation programs for licensure as a teacher of elementary education and as a reading specialist/consultant include instruction in:

Dyslexia professional awareness of the characteristics of dyslexia and related disorders;

Evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia and related disorders; and

Completion of a classroom educator program providing instruction in the use of specific dyslexia- and related disorder-targeted methods of teaching.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 2.

16-67.2-5.
Research commission.

No later than January 1, 2020, the general assembly shall form a joint study research commission (the “commission”) consisting of nine (9) members to be appointed as follows: one with expertise in educating students with learning disabilities to be appointed by the speaker of the house; one with expertise in educating students with learning disabilities to be appointed by the president of the senate; one with expertise in educating students with learning disabilities to be appointed by the governor; one member of the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house; one member of the senate, who shall be appointed by the president of the senate; three (3) teachers with expertise in dyslexia to be appointed jointly by the speaker of the house and the president of the senate; and one parent of a student with dyslexia, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house.

The purpose of the commission shall be to study the possibility and feasibility of establishing two (2) schools, to be located on the university of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college campuses, that would be dedicated to the instruction of dyslexic children and the development of instructional techniques and professional development programs used to improve the instruction and identification of dyslexia and other learning disabilities.

The commission shall be funded by the general assembly, and shall visit no fewer than four (4) schools dedicated to the education of dyslexic children, provided that if a school selected for visitation is greater than forty (40) miles away from the state of Rhode Island’s capitol building, the visit may be conducted virtually.

The commission shall render a report to the governor and to the general assembly prior to the commencement of the 2021 legislative session on the ways in which the department can enforce realistic goals pertaining to the increased availability of quality instruction for:

Students with dyslexia and other learning disabilities; and

Instructors, administrators, and special educators regarding dyslexia and other learning disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 2.